California statutes. Water Code
If another district is annexed to a district pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 75940) of Part 10 of this division the board of the annexing district shall reestablish the boundaries of the divisions and election precincts within the district in the same manner as provided in Section 74434.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Redivision of a District Within Ventura County [74450. - 74470.]



  ARTICLE 1. Introduction [74450. - 74451.]

74450.

The provisions of this chapter apply only to districts within Ventura County.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1836.)
-------------------------------------------

74451.

Except as provided in this chapter every district within Ventura County shall be governed by the provisions of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1836.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Redivision Procedure [74460. - 74470.]

74460.

The number of members of the board and the basis for dividing a district into divisions for the election of directors may be changed in the manner prescribed in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1836.)
-------------------------------------------

74461.

The change may be initiated by the board by resolution or may be initiated by a petition signed by not less than 5 percent of the electors of the district. The resolution or petition shall state the new number of members of the board or the new basis for dividing the district into divisions based either on area or population or changes to the boundaries of the divisions of a district based on population.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1195, Sec. 30.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

74462.

If the divisions are based on population, the population of each as determined by the last published decennial federal census shall be substantially equal in population. In no event shall the total population of any combination of divisions comprising a majority of the number of divisions of the district equal less than one-half of the population of the district. In no event shall the largest division exceed the population of the smallest division by a ratio exceeding 2 to 1.

In establishing the boundaries of the divisions consideration may be given to the following factors: topography, geography, cohesiveness, contiguity, compactness of territory, and community of interests of the divisions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1836.)
-------------------------------------------

74463.

When such change has been initiated the board within 60 days thereafter shall submit to the board of supervisors its report thereon containing a map or description of recommended division boundaries in accordance with this Division 21.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1836.)
-------------------------------------------

74464.

Within 40 days after receipt of the report of the board, the board of supervisors may change the division boundaries recommended by the board provided such change is in accordance with such resolution or petition and this chapter and shall fix the time and place of a hearing by the board not less than 30 nor more than 60 days thereafter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1836.)
-------------------------------------------

74465.

The clerk of the board of supervisors shall cause a notice of the time and place of the hearing to be given by publication within the district in accordance with Section 6066 of the Government Code. Such notice shall state the number of existing divisions of the district, the proposed new number of divisions or the proposed new basis for dividing the district, or both, and shall contain a general description of, or map showing, the division boundaries proposed by the board of supervisors and the population of each division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1836.)
-------------------------------------------

74466.

(a) The board of supervisors shall hear all interested persons and may adjourn the hearing from time to time. Following the hearing, the board of supervisors may further change the proposed division boundaries provided that the change is in accordance with this chapter and the resolution and petition. The board of supervisors shall make an order describing the proposed divisions of the district, numbering such divisions consecutively, and directing that such proposed redivision be submitted to the electors of the district at a special election to be consolidated with the next district general election to be held not earlier than 120 days thereafter.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a redivision involving only changes to the boundaries of the divisions of a district based upon population, independent of a change in the basis of dividing the district into divisions, shall not be submitted to the electors of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1195, Sec. 30.5.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

74467.

The election on the proposed redivision of the district shall be held in the same manner as elections for the formation of a district so far as applicable. No particular form of ballot shall be required except that the ballot shall contain the words “Shall ____ Water Conservation District representation be based on (population) (area) rather than on (area) (population) (and shall the number of ____ Water Conservation District directors be (increased) (decreased) from ____ to ____)?” To the right of or below those words, the words “yes” and “no” shall be printed on separate lines, with voting targets. Any proposed redivision or change in number of directors shall become effective if a majority of the electors voting in the election vote “yes” on the
 question.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 303, Sec. 66.   (AB 1512)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

74468.

Directors to fill vacancies in new divisions in the event the redivision is approved by the voters shall be nominated and elected at the same election in the same manner as for election of directors of a district so far as applicable. If one incumbent director resides within a proposed new division his term of office shall not be affected by the approval of the redivision by the voters of the district. If two or more incumbent directors reside within a proposed new division, the term of office of each of them will terminate on the approval of such redivision unless only one is duly nominated, in which case his term of office shall not be affected by the approval of such redivision. A candidate who is a director of the district shall be permitted to have the word “Incumbent” or words equivalent thereto placed after his name on the ballot.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1836.)
-------------------------------------------

74469.

Following approval by the voters of a redivision of the district, the directors shall, to the extent necessary, classify themselves in the manner provided by Section 74202.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1836.)
-------------------------------------------

74470.

If the board of supervisors, at any time after making an order as provided by Section 74466 and prior to the election on the proposed redivision of the district, finds that it is in the public interest to do so, it may appoint not more than two electors of the district as temporary additional directors of the district. The number of temporary additional directors thus appointed shall be irrespective of the number of existing divisions of the district and of the number of proposed new divisions of the district. Such temporary additional directors shall have all of the powers, rights and privileges of elected directors and shall hold office until the election on the proposed redivision of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1836.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 5. POWERS AND PURPOSES [74500. - 74652.]



  CHAPTER 1. Powers and Duties Generally [74500. - 74511.]

74500.

A district may:

(a) Have perpetual succession.

(b) Adopt a seal and alter it at pleasure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74501.

A district may make contracts and do all acts necessary for the full exercise of its powers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74502.

A district may appoint and employ such engineer or engineers and such attorney or attorneys as the board deems necessary or advisable to accomplish the purposes of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74503.

A district may employ and hire such men, teams, tools, implements, machinery, and equipment as the board deems expedient or advisable to perform the work which it deems necessary or advisable to accomplish the purposes of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74504.

A district shall cause such work to be done and shall acquire such property as the board deems necessary or advisable to accomplish the purposes of the district, and the board shall estimate the cost thereof, together with rights-of-way for the purpose of ingress to and egress from the works of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74505.

A district shall provide for the payment, from the proper fund, of all the debts and just claims against the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74506.

A district may disseminate information concerning the rights, properties, activities, plans, and proposals of the district; provided, however, that expenditures during any fiscal year for such purposes shall not exceed three cents ($0.03) for each one hundred dollars ($100) of assessed valuation of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74507.

A district may vote bonds, cause assessments to be levied, cause elections to be held for the voting of bonds, or on the question of special assessments.

If special assessments are voted, the district may cause them to be levied, as provided by Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 75390) of Part 8 of this division, for the purpose of paying any obligation of the district, and for the purpose of raising money to further accomplish the purposes of this division in the manner provided in this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74508.

A district may levy and collect a ground water charge for the production of water from the ground water supplies within the district or within a zone or zones thereof in the manner prescribed in Part 9 (commencing with Section 75500) of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74509.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a district may, by resolution of the board of the district, change the name of the district. Such changed name shall include the words “Water Conservation District.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 317.)
-------------------------------------------

74510.

A district may construct, operate, and maintain one or more plants, which plants are constructed after the effective date of this section, for the generation of hydroelectric power and transmission lines for the conveyance thereof. Construction of the plants or plants and transmission lines may be financed by the issuance of revenue bonds pursuant to the Revenue Bond Law of 1941 (commencing with Section 54300 of the Government Code) or any other method of financing district works as provided in this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 232, Sec. 1.   Effective July 20, 1981.)
-------------------------------------------

74511.

The hydroelectric plant or plants and transmission lines constructed pursuant to Section 74510 may be leased for operation to, or the power generated may be sold to, a public utility or public agency engaged in the distribution, use, or sale of electricity. The power generated may be used by the district for its own purposes, or for the production or transmission of water, but shall not be offered for sale directly by the district to customers other than a public utility or public agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 232, Sec. 2.   Effective July 20, 1981.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Water [74520. - 74527.]

74520.

A district may make surveys and investigations of the water supply and resources of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74521.

A district may appropriate, acquire, and conserve water and water rights for any useful purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74522.

A district may conserve, store, spread, and sink water and for such purposes may acquire or construct dams, damsites, reservoirs and reservoir sites, canals, ditches and conduits, spreading basins, sinking wells, and sinking basins.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74523.

A district may maintain, operate, and repair any of the works described in Section 74522.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74524.

A district may provide for the construction, operation, and maintenance of such works, facilities, or operations within or without the district boundaries as the board deems necessary to protect the land or property in the district from damage by flood or overflow.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74525.

A district may drill, construct, install, and operate wells, pumps, pipelines, conduits, valves, gates, meters, and other appurtenances to such wells, pipelines and conduits, and may pump water therefrom and thereby for sale, delivery, distribution, or other disposition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74526.

A district may sell, deliver, distribute, or otherwise dispose of any water that may be stored or appropriated, owned, or controlled by the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74527.

A district may fix the rates at which water may be sold by the district. The rates shall be uniform for like classes of service throughout the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Recreational Facilities [74540. - 74541.]

74540.

A district may acquire, construct, maintain, and operate recreational facilities in connection with any dams, reservoirs, or other works owned or controlled by the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74541.

A district may fix and assess reasonable charges for the use of the recreational facilities by members of the public, and may deposit any funds collected thereby with the treasurer to the credit of the district as provided in Section 74750.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Property [74550. - 74554.]

74550.

A district, for the full exercise of its powers and the accomplishment of the purposes of this division, may within or without the district:

(a) Take real and personal property of every kind by grant, appropriation, purchase, gift, devise, condemnation, or lease.

(b) Hold, use, enjoy, manage, occupy, possess, lease, or dispose of real and personal property of every kind.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74551.

The legal title to all property acquired by a district shall immediately and by operation of law vest in such district, and shall be held in trust for and set apart for the uses and purposes set forth in this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74552.

A district may take conveyances or other assurances for all property acquired by it.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74553.

A district may exercise the right of eminent domain to take any property necessary to be used for dams, damsites, reservoirs, reservoir sites, canals, ditches and conduits, spreading basins, sinking wells or sinking basins, or otherwise necessary to accomplish the purposes of this division, or to operate or to make use of such works.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 582.)
-------------------------------------------

74554.

The right of eminent domain shall not extend to any property used for, or dedicated to, cemetery purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Contracts With Other Agencies [74570. - 74630.]



  ARTICLE 1. In General [74570. - 74572.]

74570.

A district may cooperate and contract with one or more other districts or public corporations or agencies, whenever, in the opinion of the board, such cooperation or contract is desirable or advantageous to the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74570.5.

A district may contract with any state agency to finance any district improvement authorized by this division that is related to the provision of water for human consumption. The terms of the contract shall be consistent with this division. Notwithstanding any other provision in this division, the term of the contract may extend up to 30 years.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 606, Sec. 12.   Effective October 9, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

74571.

In furtherance of such cooperation a district may:

(a) Join with another district or districts organized under the laws of this state in the acquisition, purchase or construction of works or other property, real or personal, for the joint use or benefit of the cooperating districts, and may raise any necessary funds by assessments, bonds, or any other means authorized by law.

(b) Empower a cooperating district to conduct the actual construction and operation of the works, or the actual acquisition of the property, and may pay its agreed share of the cost or expense thereof by delivering and turning over to the cooperating district its bonds authorized therefor, such bonds to be received in payment at not less than par value.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74572.

If the district is annexed to a cooperating district, all bonds of the annexed district authorized for payment of its agreed share of the cost and expense of the construction and operation of works or the acquisition of property by the annexing cooperating district, shall be issued and shall be delivered to and received by the annexing district at not less than par value. Such bonds shall become the property of the annexing district and they may be collected at maturity or sold by the annexing district at not less than par value and the proceeds of sale applied to the purpose for which the bonds were issued.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Contracts for Supply of Water and Construction of Works [74590. - 74593.]

74590.

A district may contract with any city, city and county, county, or district organized under the laws of this state for a water supply.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74591.

A district may enter into contracts with municipalities, water districts of any type or kind, counties, cities and counties, the State of California, or the United States, under such terms as may be mutually advantageous, for the acquisition or construction of the works authorized by this division, and each of the parties to such contract may contribute to the cost of such acquisition or construction such sums of money as may be agreed upon. Such contracts shall provide for the operation and maintenance of the works thus acquired and for the distribution and sale of any water that may be stored or controlled by the parties thereto. Any surplus revenue derived from such sale, after paying the cost of the operation and maintenance of the works, may be distributed to the parties to the contract in such proportions as may be agreed upon, or may be used for extensions and improvements.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74592.

A district may enter into contracts with municipalities, water districts of any type or kind, counties, cities and counties, the State of California, or the United States, under such terms as may be mutually advantageous, for the acquisition or disposal of water or water rights or water storage facilities and rights, or any interest in such water, water rights, or water storage facilities and rights for any useful purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74593.

A district, whenever the board deems it to be to the advantage of the district so to do, may:

(a) Enter into contracts with municipalities, sanitary districts or other incorporated bodies, either within or without the district, providing for the delivery to the district of sewage or storm water produced by or coming from such municipalities, sanitary districts, or other incorporated bodies.

(b) Treat, purify, and recycle such water for beneficial use.

(c) Store, distribute, sell, or otherwise dispose of the water and byproducts resulting from such treatment, purification, or recycling.

The district may construct and operate the works necessary for such purposes, and may acquire or construct and may maintain pipelines, flumes, ditches, and reservoirs suitable or adaptable for the prevention of the wastage of water.

Whenever the district receives a revenue from the sale of water and byproducts in excess of the cost of operating and maintaining the works authorized in this section, it may, for the purpose of enlarging, extending, or improving such works, issue its certificates of indebtedness payable out of such excess revenues, and pledge the same for the payment of the indebtedness so created.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 28, Sec. 54.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Cooperation With the United States [74610. - 74618.]

74610.

A district may cooperate and contract with the United States either under the Federal Reclamation Act of June 17, 1902, and all acts amendatory thereof or supplementary thereto, or under any other act of Congress heretofore or hereafter enacted authorizing or permitting such cooperation or contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74611.

The cooperation or contract may be for any or all of the following purposes:

(a) Acquisition or construction of works authorized by this division.

(b) A water supply.

(c) Acquisition or disposal of water or water rights or water storage or conservation facilities and rights, and any interest in such water, water rights, or water storage or conservation facilities.

(d) Acquisition or construction of works for any useful purpose.

(e) Investigation, study, or preparation of proposals or plans for any or all of the above purposes.

(f) Obligation of the district to repay to the United States advances of funds made by the United States to the district for any or all of the above purposes. 

(g) Assumption as principal or guarantor of indebtedness to the United States.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74612.

A district may carry out and perform the terms of any contract so made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74613.

As used in this article, “United States” includes the United States, and any board, bureau, agency, office or officers, department, or corporation of the United States.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74614.

The board shall generally perform all acts necessary to exercise the authority conferred by this article, except that if the issuance of bonds of the district is necessary for such purposes, the bonds shall be voted upon and issued in the manner provided in this division for the incurring of bonded indebtedness of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74615.

When, in furtherance of a contract made with the United States, bonds of a district are authorized, such bonds may be transferred to or deposited with the United States, at not less than their par value. In such case, the interest or principal, or both, of such bonds may be legally paid to the United States and applied to the amount, or any part thereof, to be paid by the district to the United States, as provided in the contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74616.

The board may accept, on behalf of the district, appointment of the district as fiscal agent of the United States, or authorization of the district by the United States to make collection of money for, and on behalf of, the United States, and to assume the duties and liabilities incidental thereto. The board may do any and all things required by the federal statutes now or hereafter enacted in connection therewith, and all things required by any rules or regulations now or hereafter established under any such federal statutes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74617.

A contract entered into between a district and the United States may provide that the district shall not be dissolved, nor shall the boundaries be changed except upon the written consent of an official of the United States filed with the official records of the district. If such consent is given and the lands excluded, the area excluded shall be free from all liens and charges for payments to become due to the United States under any such contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74618.

As whole or partial consideration for any privileges obtained by a district under any contract with the United States, any rights-of-way or rights to water or to the property owned or acquired by the district may be conveyed by the board to the United States insofar as they may be needed for the construction, operation, and maintenance of works by the United States for the benefit of the district pursuant to such contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Approval of Contracts by Voters [74630. - 74630.]

74630.

If a district undertakes to execute a contract pursuant to this chapter, no part of the annual payments for the obligations assumed therein, as principal or guarantor, or the interest thereon, or the costs of maintenance and operation of the works so acquired or constructed, over and above the amounts available therefor from revenues, that is in excess of the limitations on assessment taxes provided in Sections 75357 and 75358, shall be levied until such contract has been approved by the voters of the district, or of the improvement district, for which such contract was made, by a majority of the voters thereof voting on the proposition, in the manner provided for the incurring of a bonded indebtedness. In the event of the approval of such contract by the voters, the limitations provided in Sections 75357 and 75358 shall not apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Controversies [74640. - 74645.]

74640.

A district may sue and be sued, except as otherwise provided in this division or by law, in all actions and proceedings in all courts and tribunals of competent jurisdiction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74641.

A district may commence, maintain, intervene in, and compromise, in the name of the district, and assume the costs of, any action or proceeding involving or affecting the ownership or use of water or water rights within the district, used or useful for any purposes of the district, or of common benefit to the lands situated therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74642.

A district may commence, maintain, intervene in, defend, and compromise actions and proceedings to prevent interference with or diminution of the natural flow of any stream or streams or unnavigable river, or rivers, including the natural subterranean supply of water therefrom, which may be used or useful for any purpose of the district, or a common benefit to the lands within the district or its inhabitants; and may commence, maintain, and defend actions and proceedings to prevent any such interference with such waters as may endanger the inhabitants or lands of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74643.

A district may institute and maintain any and all actions, proceedings, and suits at law or in equity necessary or proper to fully carry out the provisions of this division, or to enforce, maintain, protect, or preserve any and all rights, privileges, and immunities created by this division or acquired in pursuance thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74644.

In all courts, actions, suits, or proceedings, the board may sue, appear, and defend in the name of the district in person or by attorneys.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74645.

All claims for money or damages against the district are governed by Part 3 (commencing with Section 900) and Part 4 (commencing with Section 940) of Division 3.6 of Title 1 of the Government Code except as provided therein, or by other statutes or regulations expressly applicable thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Adoption of Ordinances [74650. - 74652.]

74650.

(a) A district may act by ordinance in exercising its powers under this division over lands, structures, and facilities in which the district has a real property interest. All ordinances shall be enacted only by rollcall vote entered into the proceedings of the board.

(b) It is the policy of the Legislature to avoid duplication of authority of local districts to regulate upon the same subjects in the same area. Accordingly, this chapter shall not apply to a district lying within another district having and exercising, in accordance with the governing statute of the overlying district, the authority to adopt and enforce, upon civil or penal sanction, ordinances for the same purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 612, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

74651.

An ordinance shall be in full force and effect upon adoption, but shall be published once in full in a newspaper of general circulation, printed, published, and circulated in the district within 10 days after adoption, or if there be no such newspaper, then posted within that time in three public places within the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 612, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

74652.

It is a misdemeanor for any person to violate any district ordinance adopted pursuant to Section 74650 from and after the publication or posting of the ordinance pursuant to Section 74651. The violation shall be punishable by a fine not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500), or imprisonment in the county jail not to exceed 30 days, or by both that fine and imprisonment. Any violation or threatened violation may also be enjoined by civil action.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 612, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 6. FINANCIAL PROVISIONS [74750. - 74977.]



  CHAPTER 1. Funds and Warrants [74750. - 74756.]

74750.

The treasury of the principal county is the repository of all the funds of a district. For this purpose, the treasurers of any other counties wherein is situated a portion of the district, shall, at any time, not more often than twice a year, upon the order of the board, settle with the board and pay over to the treasurer of the principal county all moneys in their possession belonging to the district. The treasurer of the principal county shall receive and receipt for such moneys, and place such moneys to the credit of the district. He shall be responsible upon his official bond for the safekeeping and disbursement, in the manner provided in this division, of these and all moneys of the district held by him.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74751.

No claim shall be paid by the treasurer until allowed by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74752.

The treasurer shall pay out the moneys of the district only upon warrants of the county auditor, drawn upon order of the board signed by the president and attested by the secretary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74753.

Upon presentation of any matured bond, or any matured interest coupon on any bond of the district, the treasurer shall pay it from the bond fund. If funds are not available for the payment of any such matured bond or interest coupon, it shall draw interest at the rate of 7 percent per annum from the date of its presentation for payment until notice is given that funds are available for its payment, and it shall be stamped and provision made for its payment, as in the case of a warrant for the payment of which funds are not available on its presentation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74754.

The treasurer shall report in writing at each regular meeting of the board, and as often thereafter as requested by the board, the amount of money on hand, the amount of receipts since his last report, and the amounts paid out. Such reports shall be verified and filed with the secretary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74755.

As an alternative to the functions of the county treasurer and the county auditor provided in this chapter, the board may elect to disburse funds of the district. Such election shall be made by resolution of the board and the filing of a certified copy thereof with the county treasurer. The county treasurer shall thereupon deliver to the district all funds of the district. Such funds shall be deposited by the board in a bank or banks approved for deposit of public funds and shall be withdrawn only by written order of the board, signed by the president and secretary. The order shall specify the name of the payee, the fund from which it is to be paid and state generally the purpose for which payment is to be made. Such order shall be entered in the minutes of the board. The board shall appoint a treasurer who shall be responsible for the deposit and withdrawal of funds of the district. The treasurer shall deposit with the district, prior to October 1 of each year, a surety bond in an amount annually fixed by the board. The deposit and withdrawal of funds of the district shall thereafter be subject to the provisions of Article 2 (commencing with Section 53630), Chapter 4, Part 1, Division 2, Title 5, of the Government Code. Any district electing to disburse funds pursuant to this section shall file with the board of supervisors an annual audit of such disbursements which meets the approval of the board of supervisors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 236.)
-------------------------------------------

74756.

The election made pursuant to Section 74755 may be rescinded by resolution of the board. No later than 30 days following any such rescission, the treasurer appointed pursuant to Section 74755 shall deliver all district funds to the county treasurer together with a certified copy of the resolution of rescission, whereupon the county treasurer and county auditor shall commence to act as provided in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 236.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Limitation on Indebtedness [74770. - 74772.]

74770.

The board has no power, except as provided in this division as to certificates of indebtedness, notes, special assessments, and the issuance of bonds by the district, to incur any debt or liability whatever in excess of the express provisions of this division. Any debt or liability incurred in excess of such express provisions, except as to certificates of indebtedness, notes, special assessments, and the issuance of bonds, is absolutely void.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1966, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 35.)
-------------------------------------------

74771.

For the purposes of organization, or for any of any purpose for which the board is authorized to expend the collection of the first assessment, an indebtedness not exceeding in the aggregate an amount equivalent of twenty-five cents ($.25) for each acre of land in the district, and it may cause warrants of the district to issue therefor bearing interest at 7 percent per year from date of issue until the treasurer has funds available for the payment thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74772.

The expenses of organization, including the fees of attorneys and others employed to conduct the organization proceedings, are a charge upon the district, and are payable by the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Bonds [74790. - 74872.]



  ARTICLE 1. In General [74790. - 74792.]

74790.

A district may incur a bonded indebtedness for any purpose for which the board is authorized to expend the funds of the district, including any works, property, or rights, contract or otherwise, acquired under or pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 74570) of Part 5 of this division, or the refunding of any obligations incurred pursuant to that chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74791.

Bonds issued by a district, and bonds issued for any improvement district therein, shall be payable, both principal and interest, from assessments upon the lands in the district or improvement district, as the case may be, unless proceedings have been taken substantially as provided in this division for such bonds to be payable from assessments levied upon all real property in the district or in the improvement district, as the case may be.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74792.

Bonds of the district may be issued in the manner provided in this chapter payable, both principal and interest, from assessments levied upon all real property in the district in the manner provided in this division for the levy of assessments upon land only.
